Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.485

Senior policy advisor to the governor—State lead for economic development relating to the outdoor recreation sector of the state's economy.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the governor must maintain a senior policy advisor to the governor to serve as a state lead on economic development issues relating to the outdoor recreation sector of the state's economy. The advisor must focus on promoting, increasing participation in, and increasing opportunities for outdoor recreation in Washington, with a particular focus on achieving economic development and job growth through outdoor recreation.

(2) The success of the advisor must be based on measurable results relating to economic development strategies that more deliberately grow employment and outdoor recreation businesses, including:

(a) Strategies for increasing the number of new jobs directly or indirectly related to outdoor recreation, with a short-term goal of increasing employment in the sector by ten percent above the one hundred ninety-nine thousand jobs estimated to be connected to outdoor recreation as of 2015; and

(b) Strategies for increasing the twenty-one billion dollars of consumer spending in Washington, and the four and one-half billion dollars of spending from out-of-state visitors, estimated to be connected to outdoor recreation as of 2015.

[ 2015 c 245 s 2.]